Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2127
Inspection; installation not in compliance with standards; written order to condemn; opportunity to correct noncompliance.

If the inspector finds that any installation or portion of an installation is not in compliance with accepted standards of construction for safety to health and property, based upon minimum standards set forth in the local electrical code or National Electrical Code, he or she shall by written order condemn the installation or noncomplying portion or order service to such installation disconnected and shall send a copy of such order to the board and the supplier involved. If the installation or the noncomplying part is such as to seriously and proximately endanger human health and property, the order of the inspector when approved by his or her superior shall require immediate condemnation and disconnection by the applicant. In all other cases, the order of the inspector shall establish a reasonable period of time for the installation to be brought into compliance with accepted standards of construction for safety to health and property prior to the effective time established in such order for condemnation or disconnection.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-597;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 24.